Maryland, session 2026, SB0686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
PART I. REQUIREMENTS AND PROHIBITIONS.
6–1601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Class B fire–fighting foam” or “foam” means a foam designed for flammable
liquid fire.

SENATE BILL 686 3
(C) (1) “CLEANING PRODUCT” MEANS A FINISHED PRODUCT USED FOR
GENERAL CLEANING OR POLISHING PURPOSES.
(2) “CLEANING PRODUCT” INCLUDES:
(I) A LAUNDRY DETERGENT OR CLOTHING SOFTENER;
(II) A DISHWASHING COMPOUND;
(III) A HOUSEHOLD CLEANER, METAL CLEANER, DEGREASING
COMPOUND, COMMERCIAL CLEANER, INDUSTRIAL CLEANER, OR PHOSPHATE
COMPOUND;
(IV) A FLOOR POLISH MAINTENANCE PRODUCT;
(V) AN AIR CARE PRODUCT LABELED FOR THE INTENDED USE
OF ENHANCING THE CONDITIONS OF THE INDOOR ENVIRONMENT BY ELIMINATING
UNPLEASANT ODORS OR FRESHENING THE AIR; AND
(VI) AN AUTOMOTIVE CLEANING PRODUCT LABELED FOR THE
INTENDED USE OF CLEANING, RESTORING, OR MAINTAINING THE APPEARANCE OF
THE INTERIOR OR EXTERIOR OF A MOTOR VEHICLE.
(3) “CLEANING PRODUCT” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN AUTOMOTIVE
PAINT OR PAINT REPAIR PRODUCT.
(D) (1) “COOKWARE” MEANS A DURABLE HOUSEWARE ITEM USED TO
PREPARE, DISPENSE, OR STORE FOOD, FOODSTUFFS, OR BEVERAGES.
(2) “COOKWARE” INCLUDES A POT, PAN, SKILLET GRILL, BAKING
SHEET, BAKING MOLD, TRAY, BOWL, OR COOKING UTENSIL.
(E) (1) “COSMETIC” MEANS A SUBSTANCE, COMPONENT OF A
SUBSTANCE, OR PRODUCT THAT IS INTENDED TO BE RUBBED, POURED, SPRINKLED
OR SPRAYED ON, INTRODUCED ONTO, OR OTHERWISE APPLIED TO THE HUMAN BODY
FOR BEAUTIFYING, PROMOTING ATTRACTIVENESS, OR ALTERING APPEARANCE.
(2) “COSMETIC” DOES NOT INCLUDE A SOAP.
(F) “CURRENTLY UNAVOIDABLE USE” MEANS A USE OF PFAS CHEMICALS:

SENATE BILL 686
(1) THAT THE DEPARTMENT HAS DETERMINED BY REGULATION TO
BE ESSENTIAL FOR HEALTH, SAFETY, OR THE FUNCTIONING OF SOCIETY; AND
(2) FOR WHICH THE DEPARTMENT HAS DETERMINED BY
REGULATION THAT ALTERNATIVES ARE NOT REASONABLY AVAILABLE.
(G) “FABRIC TREATMENT” MEANS A SUBSTANCE APPLIED TO A FABRIC FOR
STAIN, GREASE, OR WATER RESISTANCE OR FLAME RETARDANCE.
(H) (1) “FEMININE HYGIENE PRODUCT” MEANS A DISPOSABLE OR
REUSABLE PRODUCT TO COLLECT MENSTRUATION AND VAGINAL DISCHARGE.
(2) “FEMININE HYGIENE PRODUCT” INCLUDES A TAMPON, A PAD, A
SPONGE, A PAIR OF MENSTRUATION UNDERWEAR, A DISC, AN APPLICATOR, A
MENSTRUATION CUP, OR A VAGINAL DOUCHE.
[(c)] (I) “Intentionally added” means the act of deliberately using a chemical in
the formation of a product where the chemical’s continued presence is desired in the product
to provide a specific characteristic.
(J) (1) “INTIMACY PRODUCT” MEANS A SUBSTANCE, A COMPONENT OF A
SUBSTANCE, OR A PRODUCT INTENDED FOR USE DURING SEXUAL INTIMACY.
(2) “INTIMACY PRODUCT” INCLUDES:
(I) A CONDOM;
(II) GENITAL LUBRICANT; AND
(III) THE EXTERIOR SURFACE OF A PRODUCT INTENDED FOR
GENITAL STIMULATION.
(3) “INTIMACY PRODUCT” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY INTERNAL
ELECTRONIC COMPONENT OF A PRODUCT INTENDED FOR GENITAL STIMULATION.
(K) (1) “JUVENILE PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT DESIGNED OR
MARKETED FOR USE BY CHILDREN UNDER THE AGE OF 12 YEARS.
(2) “JUVENILE PRODUCT” INCLUDES:
(I) A FOAM PILLOW FOR A BABY OR TODDLER;
(II) 1. A BASSINET;

SENATE BILL 686 5
2. A BEDSIDE SLEEPER;
3. A CO–SLEEPER;
4. A CRIB MATTRESS;
5. A TODDLER MATTRESS;
6. AN INFANT TRAVEL BED;
7. A NAP COT;
8. A PORTABLE FOAM NAP MAT;
9. A PORTABLE INFANT SLEEPER;
10. A SOFT–SIDED PORTABLE CRIB;
11. AN INFANT SLEEP POSITIONER; OR
12. ANY OTHER PRODUCT LABELED AND INTENDED AS A
SLEEP SURFACE FOR INFANTS OR CHILDREN;
(III) A CHILD RESTRAINT SYSTEM FOR USE IN A MOTOR VEHICLE
OR ON AIRCRAFT;
(IV) A BOOSTER SEAT, HIGHCHAIR, HIGHCHAIR PAD, OR
PORTABLE HOOK–ON CHAIR;
(V) A PLAY MAT, PLAYPEN, OR PLAY YARD;
(VI) AN INFANT WALKER, INFANT SEAT, INFANT SWING, OR
INFANT BOUNCER;
(VII) A STROLLER OR AN INFANT CARRIER;
(VIII) A NURSING PAD OR NURSING PILLOW; AND
(IX) A CHANGING PAD.
(3) “JUVENILE PRODUCT” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) AN ELECTRONIC PRODUCT FOR CHILDREN, SUCH AS:

SENATE BILL 686
1. A PERSONAL COMPUTER;
2. AUDIO OR VIDEO EQUIPMENT;
3. CALCULATOR;
4. WIRELESS PHONE;
5. GAME CONSOLE;
6. HANDHELD DEVICE INCORPORATING A VIDEO
SCREEN; OR
7. ANY ASSOCIATED PERIPHERAL DEVICE, SUCH AS A
MOUSE, KEYBOARD, POWER SUPPLY UNIT, OR POWER CORD; OR
(II) AN ADULT MATTRESS.
(L) “MANUFACTURER” MEANS:
(1) THE PERSON THAT PRODUCED OR ASSEMBLED A PRODUCT OR
WHOSE BRAND NAME IS AFFIXED TO THE PRODUCT; OR
(2) IF THE PERSON THAT PRODUCED OR ASSEMBLED THE PRODUCT
OR WHOSE BRAND NAME IS AFFIXED TO THE PRODUCT DOES NOT HAVE AN OFFICE
OR EMPLOYEES IN THE UNITED STATES, THE IMPORTER OR FIRST DOMESTIC
DISTRIBUTOR OF THE PRODUCT.
(M) (1) “PERSONAL CARE PRODUCT” MEANS A SUBSTANCE, COMPONENT
OF A SUBSTANCE, OR PRODUCT THAT IS INTENDED FOR:
(I) CLEANING, CLEANSING, OR CONDITIONING ANY PART OF
THE BODY, SUCH AS THE SKIN, TEETH, OR HAIR; OR
(II) PROTECTING SKIN FROM THE SUN.
(2) “PERSONAL CARE PRODUCT” INCLUDES, WHETHER INTENDED
FOR USE ON HUMANS OR PETS:
(I) SHAMPOO OR HAIR CONDITIONER;
(II) SOAP, BATH GEL, OR ANY OTHER BATH PRODUCT;

SENATE BILL 686 7
(III) A TOOTHBRUSH, TOOTHPASTE, DENTAL FLOSS, OR MOUTH
WASH;
(IV) SHAVING GEL; OR
(V) SUNSCREEN.
(3) “PERSONAL CARE PRODUCT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PRODUCT FOR
WHICH A PRESCRIPTION IS REQUIRED FOR DISTRIBUTION OR DISPENSATION.
[(d)] (N) “Personal protective equipment” means items designed, intended, or
marketed to be worn by fire–fighting personnel in the performance of their fire and rescue
activities, including jackets, pants, shoes, gloves, helmets, and respiratory equipment.
[(e)] (O) “PFAS chemicals” means, when used in [fire–fighting agents,
fire–fighting equipment, food packaging, and rugs and carpets] A PRODUCT REGULATED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, a class of fluorinated organic chemicals that contain at least one
fully fluorinated carbon atom, including perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.
[(f)] (P) “Rug or carpet” means a thick fabric used to cover a floor, including:
(1) Commercial or residential broadloom carpet; and
(2) A pad or an underlayment used in conjunction with a carpet.
(Q) (1) “SKI WAX” MEANS A LUBRICANT APPLIED TO THE BOTTOM OF A
SNOW RUNNER, INCLUDING A SKI OR A SNOWBOARD, TO IMPROVE GRIP OR GLIDE
PROPERTIES.
(2) “SKI WAX” INCLUDES ASSOCIATED TUNING PRODUCTS.
[(g)] (R) “Terminal” means:
(1) A bulk liquid storage facility exclusively engaged in the merchant
wholesale distribution of petroleum products, including liquefied petroleum gas, that
contains at least one storage tank containing petroleum products with a surface area of 120
square meters or greater; or
(2) A facility engaged in the distribution of crude petroleum from
extraction or processing facilities that includes at least one storage tank containing crude
petroleum with a surface area of 120 square meters or greater.

SENATE BILL 686
(S) (1) “TEXTILE” MEANS AN ITEM MADE IN WHOLE OR IN PART FROM A
NATURAL OR SYNTHETIC FIBER, YARN, OR FABRIC, INCLUDING LEATHER, COTTON,
SILK, JUTE, HEMP, WOOL, VISCOSE, NYLON, OR POLYESTER.
(2) “TEXTILE” INCLUDES:
(I) OUTERWEAR; AND
(II) BEDDING.
(T) (1) “TEXTILE FURNISHING” MEANS A TEXTILE PRODUCT MADE IN
WHOLE OR IN PART FROM A NATURAL OR SYNTHETIC FIBER, YARN, OR FABRIC THAT
IS USED AS FURNITURE OR AS A DECORATIVE ACCESSORY.
(2) “TEXTILE FURNISHING” INCLUDES A MATTRESS.
(U) “UPHOLSTERED FURNITURE” MEANS FURNITURE THAT IS WHOLLY OR
PARTIALLY STUFFED WITH A FILLING MATERIAL.
6–1602.
(A) The Department shall adopt regulations to carry out this subtitle.
(B) THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE ARE IN ADDITION TO ANY
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER:
(1) SUBTITLE 16A OF THIS TITLE;
(2) TITLE 9, SUBTITLE 19 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(3) § 21–259.2 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
6–1603.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, on or after January
1, 2024, a person may not use, manufacture, or knowingly sell, offer for sale, or distribute
for sale or use Class B fire–fighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals
in the State.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a person may use, manufacture, sell,
offer for sale, or distribute for sale or use Class B fire–fighting foam that contains
intentionally added PFAS chemicals in the State:
(1) On or before September 30, 2024, if the fire–fighting foam will be used
at an airport, a port, a refinery, or a chemical plant;

SENATE BILL 686 9
(2) On or before December 31, 2027, if the fire–fighting foam will be used
at a terminal; and
(3) On or before any applicable date specified in federal law, if the
fire–fighting foam will be used by a person that is required to use Class B fire–fighting
foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals.
(c) (1) A person that is authorized under subsection (b) of this section to use
Class B fire–fighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals:
(i) May not release the foam directly into the environment,
including through unsealed ground, soakage pits, waterways, or uncontrolled drains; and
(ii) Shall:
1. Fully contain all releases on site;
2. Implement containment measures, including bunds and
ponds, that are controlled and impervious to PFAS chemicals and do not allow firewater,
wastewater, runoff, and other wastes to be released into the environment, including soils,
groundwater, waterways, and stormwater;
3. Dispose of all firewater, wastewater, runoff, and other
wastes in a way that prevents releases into the environment;
4. Within 5 days after a release in violation of item (i) of this
paragraph, report the release to the Department, including information on the identity of
the foam, the quantity used, the total PFAS concentration, and the form of any waste that
contains PFAS chemicals; and
5. Maintain documentation on any measures taken under
this paragraph.
(2) (i) In investigating compliance with this subsection, the
Department, the Attorney General, a State’s Attorney for a county or Baltimore City, a
county attorney, or a City Attorney may request documentation maintained under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(ii) A person that receives a request under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall provide the documentation on request.
(3) A failure to meet the requirements of paragraph (1) or (2) of this
subsection does not preclude the use of Class B fire–fighting foam containing intentionally
added PFAS chemicals if the failure was a result of factors beyond the control of the person.

SENATE BILL 686
(d) (1) If a person sells personal protective equipment for fire fighting that
contains PFAS chemicals in the State, the person shall provide written notice to the
purchaser at the time of the sale that includes:
(i) A statement that the personal protective equipment contains
PFAS chemicals; and
(ii) The reason that the personal protective equipment contains
PFAS chemicals.
(2) Both the person selling personal protective equipment for fire fighting
that contains PFAS chemicals and the purchaser of the personal protective equipment shall
retain the notice under paragraph (1) of this subsection for at least 3 years after the date
of the sale.
(e) (1) On request of a fire department in the State, the Department shall take
back from the fire department Class B fire–fighting foam that contains intentionally added
PFAS chemicals.
(2) The Department shall dispose of fire–fighting foam received under this
subsection in a manner consistent with this subtitle.
(3) For fiscal year 2024, the Governor shall include in the annual budget
bill an appropriation of $500,000 to the Department for the purpose of taking back and
disposing of fire–fighting foam under this section.
(F) A PERSON MAY NOT DISPOSE OF A CLASS B FIRE–FIGHTING FOAM THAT
CONTAINS INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS CHEMICALS:
(1) USING INCINERATION, INCLUDING BY BURNING, COMBUSTION,
PYROLYSIS, GASIFICATION, THERMAL OXIDATION, ACID RECOVERY FURNACE OR
OXIDIZER, ORE ROASTER, CEMENT KILN, LIGHTWEIGHT AGGREGATE KILN,
INDUSTRIAL FURNACE BOILER, AND PROCESS HEATER; OR
(2) IN A LANDFILL.
[6–1604.
A person may not dispose of a Class B fire–fighting foam that contains intentionally
added PFAS chemicals:
(1) Using incineration, including by burning, combustion, pyrolysis,
gasification, thermal oxidation, acid recovery furnace or oxidizer, ore roaster, cement kiln,
lightweight aggregate kiln, industrial furnace boiler, and process heater; or
(2) In a landfill.]

SENATE BILL 686 11
[6–1604.1.] 6–1604.
(a) This section does not apply to the sale or resale of a used rug or carpet.
(b) On or after January 1, 2024, a person may not manufacture or knowingly sell,
offer for sale, or distribute for sale or use in the State a rug or carpet to which PFAS
chemicals have been intentionally added.
(c) (1) A person that manufactures a rug or carpet for sale or use in the State
shall establish a certificate of compliance to attest that the rug or carpet is in compliance
with the requirements of this section.
(2) Within 30 days after a request by the Department, a person shall
provide the certificate of compliance established under paragraph (1) of this subsection to
the Department.
6–1605.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) A PRODUCT FOR WHICH FEDERAL LAW GOVERNS THE PRESENCE
OF PFAS CHEMICALS IN THE PRODUCT IN A MANNER THAT PREEMPTS STATE
AUTHORITY;
(2) A USED PRODUCT OFFERED FOR SALE OR RESALE, INCLUDING
ANY RECYCLED MATERIAL USED IN REMANUFACTURING; OR
(3) A PRODUCT FOR WHICH THE DEPARTMENT HAS DETERMINED BY
REGULATION THAT THE USE OF PFAS CHEMICALS IS A CURRENTLY UNAVOIDABLE
USE.
(B) ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028, A MANUFACTURER MAY NOT SELL,
OFFER FOR SALE, DISTRIBUTE, OR DISTRIBUTE FOR SALE IN THE STATE, DIRECTLY
OR INDIRECTLY OR THROUGH INTERMEDIARIES, THE FOLLOWING PRODUCTS IF THE
PRODUCT CONTAINS INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS CHEMICALS:
(1) A CLEANING PRODUCT;
(2) COOKWARE;
(3) A COSMETIC;
(4) A PERSONAL CARE PRODUCT;

SENATE BILL 686
(5) A FEMININE HYGIENE PRODUCT;
(6) A PET FOOD PACKAGE OR PACKAGING COMPONENT INTENDED
FOR DIRECT FOOD CONTACT WITH PET FOOD;
(7) A JUVENILE PRODUCT; OR
(8) AN INTIMACY PRODUCT.
(C) ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2029, A MANUFACTURER MAY NOT SELL,
OFFER FOR SALE, DISTRIBUTE, OR DISTRIBUTE FOR SALE IN THE STATE, DIRECTLY
OR INDIRECTLY OR THROUGH INTERMEDIARIES, THE FOLLOWING PRODUCTS IF THE
PRODUCT CONTAINS INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS CHEMICALS:
(1) A FABRIC TREATMENT;
(2) SKI WAX;
(3) A TEXTILE;
(4) TEXTILE FURNISHING;
(5) UPHOLSTERED FURNITURE; OR
(6) PAINT.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IDENTIFY CURRENTLY UNAVOIDABLE USES OF PFAS
CHEMICALS THAT:
(I) ARE ESSENTIAL FOR HEALTH, SAFETY, OR THE
FUNCTIONING OF SOCIETY; AND
(II) FOR WHICH ALTERNATIVES ARE NOT REASONABLY
AVAILABLE.
(2) IN DEVELOPING REGULATIONS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH:
(I) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH; AND
(II) OTHER UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT AS THE
DEPARTMENT DEEMS NECESSARY.

SENATE BILL 686 13
6–1606.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL PRODUCTS CONTAINING
INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS CHEMICALS, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE
DEPARTMENT HAS DETERMINED THAT THE USE OF PFAS CHEMICALS IN THE
PRODUCT IS A CURRENTLY UNAVOIDABLE USE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–1605(D)
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, ON
OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, EACH MANUFACTURER OF A PRODUCT SOLD,
OFFERED FOR SALE, DISTRIBUTED, OR DISTRIBUTED FOR SALE IN THE STATE,
DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY OR THROUGH INTERMEDIARIES, SHALL REGISTER THE
PRODUCT WITH THE DEPARTMENT BY:
(I) SUBMITTING TO THE DEPARTMENT A PFAS CHEMICALS
DISCLOSURE FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) PAYING TO THE DEPARTMENT THE PFAS CHEMICALS
REGISTRATION FEE ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A MANUFACTURER SHALL SUBMIT A REVISION TO THE
INFORMATION PROVIDED ON A PFAS CHEMICALS DISCLOSURE FORM WITHIN 30
DAYS OF:
(I) A SIGNIFICANT CHANGE TO THE PREVIOUSLY PROVIDED
INFORMATION; OR
(II) RECEIVING A WRITTEN REQUEST FOR ADDITIONAL
INFORMATION FROM THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) ON WRITTEN APPROVAL FROM THE DEPARTMENT, A
MANUFACTURER MAY PROVIDE THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A CATEGORY OR TYPE OF PRODUCT OR
PRODUCT COMPONENT.
(C) WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A PFAS CHEMICAL DISCLOSURE
FORM UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE MANUFACTURER:
(1) CONFIRMING THAT THE INFORMATION IS COMPLETE; OR

SENATE BILL 686
(2) REQUESTING ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM THE
MANUFACTURER.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE THE OBLIGATION OF A
MANUFACTURER TO PROVIDE ALL OR PART OF THE INFORMATION REQUIRED
UNDER A PFAS DISCLOSURE FORM IF:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT SUBSTANTIALLY
EQUIVALENT INFORMATION IS PUBLICLY AVAILABLE; OR
(II) THE MANUFACTURER DEMONSTRATES THAT THE PRODUCT
MEETS EQUIVALENT REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS IN ANOTHER STATE OR
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF A STATE WITH WHICH THE DEPARTMENT HAS
ESTABLISHED AN INFORMATION SHARING AGREEMENT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH ONE
OR MORE STATES OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS OF A STATE TO COLLECT
INFORMATION ON PFAS CHEMICAL USE AND MAY ACCEPT INFORMATION TO A
SHARED SYSTEM AS MEETING THE INFORMATION REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED
FOR PFAS CHEMICALS DISCLOSURE FORMS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(3) A WAIVER GRANTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE GRANTED
FOR MULTIPLE PRODUCTS OR A PRODUCT CATEGORY.
(4) A WAIVER GRANTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT
RELEASE A MANUFACTURER FROM THE OBLIGATION TO PAY THE PFAS CHEMICALS
REGISTRATION FEE ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY EXTEND THE DEADLINE FOR A MANUFACTURER
TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IF THE
DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT CIRCUMSTANCES MERIT AN EXTENSION.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL, BY REGULATION, ESTABLISH A PFAS
CHEMICALS REGISTRATION FEE AT A LEVEL ADEQUATE TO COVER THE COSTS TO
THE DEPARTMENT OF PROCESSING, STORING, AND ENFORCING THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) PFAS CHEMICALS REGISTRATION FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED TO THE MARYLAND PFAS CHEMICALS PROTECTION
AND REMEDIATION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 6–1612 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2029, A MANUFACTURER MAY NOT SELL,
OFFER FOR SALE, DISTRIBUTE, OR DISTRIBUTE FOR SALE, DIRECTLY OR

SENATE BILL 686 15
INDIRECTLY OR THROUGH INTERMEDIARIES, A PRODUCT THAT CONTAINS
INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS CHEMICALS UNLESS THE MANUFACTURER IS IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
6–1607.
(A) FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETERMINING COMPLIANCE WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) IF THE DEPARTMENT HAS REASON TO BELIEVE THAT A PRODUCT
CONTAINING INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS CHEMICALS IS BEING SOLD, OFFERED
FOR SALE, DISTRIBUTED, OR DISTRIBUTED FOR SALE IN THE STATE IN VIOLATION
OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE THE MANUFACTURER TO
TEST THE PRODUCT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) AT LEAST ONCE PER YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) RANDOMLY SELECT PRODUCTS IN EACH CATEGORY FOR
WHICH INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS CHEMICALS ARE PROHIBITED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(II) REQUIRE EACH MANUFACTURER OF A RANDOMLY
SELECTED PRODUCT TO TEST THE PRODUCT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE THE MANUFACTURER OF A PRODUCT,
WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING WRITTEN NOTICE FROM THE DEPARTMENT, TO
PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT WITH TESTING RESULTS THAT DEMONSTRATE THE
AMOUNT OF EACH PFAS CHEMICAL IN THE PRODUCT, IDENTIFIED BY THE
CHEMICAL’S ABSTRACTS SERVICE REGISTRY NUMBER, AND REPORTED:
(1) AS AN EXACT QUANTITY DETERMINED USING COMMERCIALLY
AVAILABLE ANALYTICAL METHODS; OR
(2) AS FALLING WITHIN A RANGE APPROVED FOR REPORTING
PURPOSES BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) IF TESTING CONDUCTED UNDER THIS SECTION DEMONSTRATES THAT
THE PRODUCT DOES NOT CONTAIN INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS CHEMICALS, THE
MANUFACTURER SHALL PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT WITH:
(1) A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE ATTESTING THAT THE PRODUCT
DOES NOT CONTAIN INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS SUBSTANCES;

SENATE BILL 686
(2) THE TESTING RESULTS; AND
(3) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(D) IF TESTING CONDUCTED UNDER THIS SECTION DEMONSTRATES THAT
THE PRODUCT CONTAINS INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS CHEMICALS, THE
MANUFACTURER SHALL:
(1) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE TESTING RESULTS,
REGISTER THE PRODUCT WITH THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–1606
OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) IF THE SALE OF THE PRODUCT IS PROHIBITED IN THE STATE:
(I) NOTIFY EACH PERSON THAT SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE,
DISTRIBUTES, OR DISTRIBUTES FOR SALE THE PRODUCT IN THE STATE THAT THE
PRODUCT IS PROHIBITED;
(II) PROVIDE THE DEPARTMENT WITH A LIST OF THE NAME AND
ADDRESS OF EACH PERSON NOTIFIED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
(III) BUY BACK ANY REMAINING STOCK OF THE PRODUCT FROM
A PERSON THAT SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE, DISTRIBUTES, OR DISTRIBUTES FOR SALE
THE PRODUCT IN THE STATE AT THE ORIGINAL PURCHASE PRICE.
[6–1605.] 6–1608.
(A) A person who violates § 6–1603 OR § 6–1604 OF this subtitle is subject to:
(1) For a first violation, [a civil] AN ADMINISTRATIVE penalty not
exceeding $500; and
(2) For a second or subsequent violation, [a civil] AND ADMINISTRATIVE
penalty not exceeding $1,000.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, A
MANUFACTURER WHO VIOLATES A PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO AN
ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $15,000.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE AN ADMINISTRATIVE ORDER
REQUIRING A MANUFACTURER TO COMPLY WITH A REQUIREMENT OR PROHIBITION
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 686 17
(2) (I) IN ADDITION TO THE PENALTIES PROVIDED UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B) OF THIS SECTION, A MANUFACTURER WHO VIOLATES AN
ADMINISTRATIVE ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $25,000 TO BE COLLECTED IN A CIVIL ACTION BROUGHT
BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(II) EACH DAY OF NONCOMPLIANCE WITH AN ADMINISTRATIVE
ORDER SHALL BE CONSIDERED A SEPARATE VIOLATION FOR PURPOSES OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(D) PENALTIES IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO
ANY DAMAGES, REMEDIATION OR CLEANUP COSTS, ENVIRONMENTAL RESTORATION
COSTS, OR OTHER MONETARY OR NONMONETARY REMEDIES THAT MAY BE IMPOSED
BY STATUTE, REGULATION, OR COURT ORDER.
(E) PENALTIES IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED TO
THE MARYLAND PFAS CHEMICALS PROTECTION AND REMEDIATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 6–1612 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
6–1609. RESERVED.
6–1610. RESERVED.
PART II. MARYLAND PFAS CHEMICALS PROTECTION AND REMEDIATION FUND
AND GRANT PROGRAM.
6–1611.
IN THIS PART, “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND PFAS CHEMICALS
PROTECTION AND REMEDIATION FUND.
6–1612.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND PFAS CHEMICALS PROTECTION AND
REMEDIATION FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO FUND EFFORTS TO ASSESS, PREVENT,
AND REMEDIATE CONTAMINATION FROM PFAS CHEMICALS ACROSS THE STATE’S
WATERSHEDS, COMMUNITIES, AND ECOSYSTEMS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND IN CONSULTATION
WITH:

SENATE BILL 686
(1) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH;
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE;
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES;
(4) THE CHESAPEAKE BAY TRUST; AND
(5) LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENTS.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) PFAS CHEMICAL REGISTRATION FEES COLLECTED UNDER §
6–1606 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) ANY PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER:
(I) § 6–1608 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) § 6–16A–05 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(III) § 9–1906 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) COST RECOVERY BY THE STATE FROM PFAS CHEMICALS
POLLUTERS UNDER STATE OR FEDERAL ENVIRONMENTAL LAWS;
(4) MONEY OBTAINED BY THE STATE THROUGH ANY CIVIL
SETTLEMENT OR CONSENT DECREE RELATED TO PFAS CHEMICALS POLLUTION;
(5) MONEY ACCEPTED FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND THROUGH
PRIVATE DONATIONS, COST–SHARE AGREEMENTS, PUBLIC–PRIVATE
PARTNERSHIPS, OR INVESTMENTS RELATED TO ADDRESSING OR REMEDIATING
PFAS CHEMICALS POLLUTION;
(6) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(7) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND

SENATE BILL 686 19
(8) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR:
(1) ASSESSING AND MONITORING PFAS CHEMICALS POLLUTION,
INCLUDING:
(I) SAMPLING PUBLIC AND PRIVATE WATER SUPPLY WELLS,
SURFACE WATERS, SOILS, AND FISH TISSUE; AND
(II) CREATING AND OPERATING A PUBLIC PFAS CHEMICALS
DATE MAP AND REGISTRY OF CONTAMINATED SITES;
(2) IMPLEMENTING COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE AND REMEDIATION
INITIATIVES, INCLUDING:
(I) PROVIDING EMERGENCY RELIEF TO HOUSEHOLDS AND
FARM OPERATIONS IMPACTED BY PFAS CHEMICALS CONTAMINATION;
(II) PROVIDING TECHNICAL AND FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO
WATER SYSTEMS REGULATED UNDER THE FEDERAL SAFE DRINKING WATER ACT,
SMALL WASTEWATER TREATMENT SYSTEMS, AND OVERBURDENED OR
UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES; AND
(III) CONDUCTING COMMUNITY HEALTH STUDIES, EDUCATION,
AND OUTREACH;
(3) SUPPORTING RESEARCH AND INNOVATION RELATED TO PFAS
CHEMICALS POLLUTION, INCLUDING:
(I) DEVELOPING, IMPROVING, AND VALIDATING THE
EFFECTIVENESS AND COST–EFFECTIVENESS OF TECHNOLOGIES FOR THE
DETECTION AND REMEDIATION OF PFAS CHEMICALS; AND
(II) IMPLEMENTING RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS
RELATED TO THE REMOVAL OF PFAS CHEMICALS FROM VARIOUS ENVIRONMENTAL
MEDIA, INCLUDING WASTEWATER INFLUENT AND EFFLUENT, SEWAGE SLUDGE,
LANDFILL LEACHATE, AND STORMWATER;

SENATE BILL 686
(4) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–1613 OF THIS SUBTITLE, PROVIDING
GRANTS AND LOANS RELATED TO THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPHS
(1) THROUGH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(5) OFFSETTING THE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS INCURRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT TO DESIGN AND IMPLEMENT PROGRAMS RELATED TO PFAS
CHEMICALS, INCLUDING THE DEVELOPMENT OF REGULATIONS; AND
(6) SUPPORTING ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS BROUGHT BY THE STATE
AGAINST DISCHARGERS, EMITTERS, AND OTHER USERS OF PFAS CHEMICALS
POLLUTERS, INCLUDING ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES RELATED TO ENFORCEMENT
ACTIONS.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 15 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REPORT TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE
ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ENVIRONMENT AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, ON THE STATUS OF THE FUND, INCLUDING A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF
ALL REVENUES AND EXPENDITURES OF THE FUND FOR THE PREVIOUS YEAR.
6–1613.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE GRANTS AND LOANS FROM THE
FUND TO PUBLIC AND PRIVATE ENTITIES FOR PROJECTS RELATED TO THE
PURPOSES OF THE FUND.
(B) GRANTS AND LOANS SHALL BE AWARDED ON A COMPETITIVE BASIS.
(C) IN AWARDING GRANTS AND LOANS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) PRIORITIZE PROJECTS THAT LEVERAGE OTHER SOURCES OF
FUNDING, INCLUDING FEDERAL, LOCAL, OR PRIVATE SOURCES;

SENATE BILL 686 21
(2) RESERVE AT LEAST 35% OF THE TOTAL FUNDING ALLOCATED FOR
GRANTS AND LOANS UNDER THIS SECTION FOR PROJECTS ADDRESSING COMMUNITY
AND PUBLIC HEALTH THREATS RELATED TO PFAS CHEMICALS CONTAMINATION;
AND
(3) TO THE EXTENT FEASIBLE, COORDINATE WITH OTHER STATE
GRANT– AND LOAN–MAKING PROGRAMS, INCLUDING PROGRAMS FUNDED UNDER
THE BAY RESTORATION FUND, THE CHESAPEAKE AND ATLANTIC COASTAL BAYS
2010 TRUST FUND, THE MARYLAND CLEAN WATER FUND, AND THE MARYLAND
AGRICULTURAL WATER QUALITY COST–SHARE PROGRAM.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH CRITERIA FOR
PROJECT APPLICATIONS IN CONSULTATION WITH THE AGENCIES AND ENTITIES
SPECIFIED UNDER § 6–1612(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN A PUBLIC WEBSITE LISTING
DETAILED INFORMATION REGARDING:
(1) EACH AWARD MADE UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) THE OUTCOMES OF EACH PROJECT FUNDED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
6–16A–05.
(C) PENALTIES IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED IN
THE MARYLAND PFAS CHEMICALS PROTECTION AND REMEDIATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 6–1612 OF THIS TITLE.
9–1906.
(D) PENALTIES IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR VIOLATIONS OF §
9–1902(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE DEPOSITED IN THE MARYLAND PFAS
CHEMICALS PROTECTION AND REMEDIATION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 6–1612
OF THIS ARTICLE.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to

SENATE BILL 686
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE MARYLAND PFAS CHEMICALS PROTECTION
AND REMEDIATION FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.